Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-196
Bonds; interest; dates and place of payment.

Such bonds shall bear interest payable semiannually on the first day of January and July of each year. The principal and interest shall be payable at the office of the treasurer of the county in which the district originally organized.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 13, p. 280;

Laws 1903, c. 122, § 1, p. 623;

Laws 1909, c. 155, § 2, p. 563;

Laws 1911, c. 160, § 1, p. 531;

R.S.1913, § 3469;

C.S.1922, § 2869;

C.S.1929, § 46-113;

R.S.1943, § 46-196;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 111, p. 341.